sl-SI: Sorte buč in bučk: Želodasta buča; Zimska melona; Grenka melona (Karela); Navadna buča (Dudhi); Buča Buttercup; Maslena buča; Čajota; Krivovrata buča; Buča Cushaw; Buča Delicata; Buča Futsu; Okrasna buča; Buča Honeynut; Buča Hubbard; Tindora; Buča Kabocha; Patišon buča (Scallopini); Navadna buča; Rebrasta lufa; Kačja buča (Padwal); Špagetna buča; Turban buča; Rumena buča; Bučka (Zucchini); Drugo
pt-BR: Abóbora e cabaça variedade: Bolota; Abóbora-d'água; Melão-de-são-caetano (Karela); Cabaça (Dudhi); Buttercup; Abóbora-menina; Chuchu; Abóbora crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Cabaça (decorativa); Honeynut; Hubbard; Cabaça-hera (Tindora); Cabotiá; Pattypan; Abóbora; Bucha (Ridge gourd); Abóbora-serpente (Padwal); Abóbora-espaguete; Abóbora turbante; Abóbora amarela; Abobrinha; Outro
ro-RO: Soi de dovleac și tărtăcuță: Acorn; Dovleac de ceară; Pepene amar (Karela); Tărtăcuță (Dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chayote; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Tărtăcuță (decorativă); Honeynut; Hubbard; Tărtăcuță iederă (Tindora); Kabocha; Pattypan (Scallopini); Dovleac; Luffa; Tărtăcuță șarpe (Padwal); Dovleac spaghetti; Turban; Dovleac galben; Dovlecel (Zucchini); Altele
zh-CN: 南瓜及葫芦品种: 橡果南瓜; 冬瓜; 苦瓜 (Karela); 瓠瓜 (Dudhi); 奶油杯南瓜; 奶油南瓜; 佛手瓜; 弯颈南瓜; 库肖南瓜; 甜心南瓜; 菊座南瓜; 观赏葫芦; 蜂蜜坚果南瓜; 哈伯特南瓜; 红瓜 (Tindora); 贝贝南瓜; 飞碟瓜; 南瓜; 丝瓜; 蛇瓜; 金丝瓜/鱼翅瓜; 头巾南瓜; 黄南瓜; 西葫芦; 其他
lt-LT: Moliūgų ir cukinijų veislė: Giliniai; Vaškiniai; Karčiosios dygmoliūgės (Karela); Paprastieji ilgmoliūgai (Dudhi); Sviestiniai (Buttercup); Muskusiniai moliūgai; Čajotai; Lenktakakliai moliūgai; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Dekoratyviniai moliūgai; Honeynut; Hubbard; Raivieji ilgmoliūgai (Tindora); Kabocha; Patisonai (Scallopini); Moliūgai; Briaunuotosios lufos; Gyvatiniai ilgmoliūgai (Padwal); Spagetiniai; Turbaniniai; Geltonieji moliūgai; Cukinijos; Kita
fr: Variété de courge ou de calebasse: Courgeron; Courge cireuse; Margose (karela); Calebasse (dudhi); Buttercup; Doubeurre (butternut); Chayotte; Courge torticolis; Courge de Virginie; Courge délicata; Courge Futsu; Coloquinte (décorative); Honeynut; Courge de Hubbard; Courge écarlate (tindora); Potiron kabocha; Pâtisson (scallopini); Citrouille; Courge éponge; Courge serpent (padwal); Courge spaghetti; Giraumon (turban); Courge jaune; Zucchini (courgette); Autre
tr: Kabak/su kabağı çeşidi: Meşe palamudu kabağı; Kül kabağı; Kudret narı (Karela); Su kabağı (Dudhi); Buttercup; Armut kabak; Çayot; Eğri boyunlu kabak; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Süs kabağı; Honeynut; Hubbard; Tindora (Ivy gourd); Kabocha; Patisson kabağı; Bal kabağı; Sünger kabağı; Yılan kabağı (Padwal); Spagetti; Türban; Sarı kabak; Sakız kabağı (Zucchini); Diğer
th: พันธุ์ฟักทองและบวบ: เอคอร์น; ฟักเขียว; มะระ (Karela); น้ำเต้า (Dudhi); บัตเตอร์คัพ; บัตเตอร์นัท; ฟักแม้ว; ครุกเนค; คูชอว์; เดลิคาตา; ฟุตสึ; น้ำเต้า (สำหรับประดับ); ฮันนี่นัท; ฮับบาร์ด; ตำลึง (Tindora); คาโบชะ; แพตตี้แพน (Scallopini); ฟักทอง; บวบเหลี่ยม; บวบงู (Padwal); สปาเก็ตตี้; เทอร์แบน; สควอชสีเหลือง; ซุกกินี (Courgette); อื่นๆ
ru: Сорт тыквы и бахчевых: Желудевая; Восковая тыква; Момордика (карела); Лагенария (дудхи); Баттеркап; Баттернат; Чайот; Крукнек; Кашоу; Деликата; Фуцу; Декоративная тыква; Ханинаут; Хаббард; Кокциния индийская (тиндора); Кабоча; Патиссон (скаллопини); Тыква; Люффа; Трихозант (змеевидная тыква); Спагетти; Чалмовидная; Желтая тыква; Цукини (кабачок); Другое
bg-BG: Вид тиква или кратуна: Жълъдова тиква (Acorn); Восъчна тиква (Ash gourd); Горчив пъпеш (Karela); Кратуна (Dudhi); Тиква тип Buttercup; Мускатна тиква (Butternut); Чайот; Кривошийка (Crookneck); Тиква Cushaw; Деликата; Футсу; Кратуна (декоративна); Медена тиква (Honeynut); Хъбард; Тиндора (Ivy gourd); Кабоча; Патисон (Scallopini); Тиква; Оребрена кратуна (Ridge gourd); Змиевидна кратуна (Padwal); Тиква спагети; Турбан; Жълта тиква; Тиквичка; Друго
nl: Pompoen en kalebas soort: Eikelpompoen; Waspompoen; Sopropo (Karela); Flespompoen (dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chayote; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Sierpompoen; Honeynut; Hubbard; Tindora; Kabocha; Patisson (scallopini); Pompoen; Sponskomkommer; Slangenpompoen (padwal); Spaghettipompoen; Tulbandpompoen; Yellow squash; Courgette; Overige
it: Varietà di zucca e cucurbitacea: Zucca acorn; Zucca di cera; Zucca amara (karela); Zucca a fiasco (dudhi); Zucca buttercup; Zucca butternut; Chayote; Zucchina crookneck; Zucca cushaw; Zucca delicata; Zucca futsu; Zucca (decorativa); Zucca honeynut; Zucca hubbard; Zucca edera (tindora); Zucca kabocha; Zucchina patissone (scallopini); Zucca; Luffa angolare; Zucca serpente (padwal); Zucca spaghetti; Zucca turbante; Zucchina gialla; Zucchina (zucchino); Altro
ja: カボチャとヒョウタンの品種: エイコーン; トウガン; ゴーヤ; ユウガオ; バターカップ; バターナッツ; ハヤトウリ; クルックネック; クショー; デリカタ; 菊座かぼちゃ; 飾り用ひょうたん; ハニーナッツ; ハバード; スズメウリ; かぼちゃ; パティパン (スキャロピーニ); パンプキン; トカドヘチマ; ヘビウリ; そうめんかぼちゃ; ターバン; イエロースカッシュ; ズッキーニ; その他
sv: Squash- och kalebasssort: Acorn; Vaxpumpa (Ash gourd); Bittergurka (Karela); Flaskkurbits (Dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chayote; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Prydnadspumpa; Honeynut; Hubbard; Scharlakansgurka (Tindora); Kabocha; Pattypan (Scallopini); Pumpa; Svampgurka (Ridge gourd); Ormgurka (Padwal); Spaghettipumpa; Turbanpumpa; Gul squash; Zucchini (courgette); Övrigt
de: Kürbis- und Flaschenkürbisart: Eichelkürbis; Wachskürbis; Bittermelone (Karela); Flaschenkürbis (Dudhi); Buttercup-Kürbis; Butternut-Kürbis; Chayote; Crookneck-Kürbis; Cushaw-Kürbis; Delicata-Kürbis; Futsu; Zierkürbis; Honeynut-Kürbis; Hubbard-Kürbis; Scharlachranke (Tindora); Kabocha; Patisson (Ufo-Kürbis); Kürbis; Luffagurke; Schlangenkürbis (Padwal); Spaghettikürbis; Turbankürbis; Gelber Kürbis; Zucchini; Sonstige
hr-HR: Sorte tikve i tikvice: Žir bundeva; Pepeljasta tikva; Gorka dinja (Karela); Vrg (Dudhi); Buttercup bundeva; Butternut bundeva; Čajot; Crookneck tikvica; Cushaw tikva; Delicata bundeva; Futsu bundeva; Ukrasna tikva; Honeynut bundeva; Hubbard bundeva; Tindora (Ivy gourd); Kabocha bundeva; Pattypan (Scallopini); Bundeva; Rebrasta tikva; Zmijska tikva (Padwal); Špageti bundeva; Turban bundeva; Žuta tikvica; Tikvica (zucchini); Ostalo
es: Variedades de calabaza y calabacín: Bellota; Calabaza blanca; Melón amargo (karela); Calabaza de peregrino (dudhi); Calabaza buttercup; Calabaza butternut; Chayote; Calabaza de cuello curvo; Calabaza cushaw; Calabaza delicata; Futsu; Calabaza (decorativa); Calabaza honeynut; Calabaza hubbard; Calabaza hiedra (tindora); Kabocha; Calabaza bonetera (scallopini); Calabaza; Calabaza acanalada; Calabaza serpiente (padwal); Espagueti; Turbante; Calabaza amarilla; Calabacín (zucchini); Otro
el: Ποικιλία κολοκυθιού και κολοκύθας: Βελανίδι (Acorn); Φλασκιά (Ash gourd); Πικρό πεπόνι (Karela); Νεροκολόκυθο (Dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Τσαγιότε; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Κολοκύθα (διακοσμητική); Honeynut; Hubbard; Tindora; Kabocha; Pattypan (Scallopini); Κολοκύθα; Ridge gourd; Φιδοκολόκυθο (Padwal); Κολοκύθα σπαγγέτι; Turban; Κίτρινη κολοκύθα; Κολοκυθάκι; Άλλο
nb: Squash- og kalebassvariant: Acorn-gresskar; Voksgresskar; Bittergresskar (Karela); Flaskegresskar (Dudhi); Buttercup-gresskar; Butternut-gresskar; Chayote; Crookneck-squash; Cushaw; Delicata-gresskar; Futsu; Pyntegresskar; Honeynut-gresskar; Hubbard-gresskar; Tindora (Ivy gourd); Kabocha; Pattison-squash (Scallopini); Gresskar; Ridge gourd; Slangegresskar (Padwal); Spaghettisquash; Turbangresskar; Gul squash; Zucchini (squash); Annet
sk-SK: Odroda tekvíc a tekvicových rastlín: Žaluďová; Voskovec; Karela (horká tekvica); Kalebasa (Dudhi); Buttercup; Maslová; Čajot; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Okrasná tekvica; Honeynut; Hubbard; Tindora; Kabocha; Patizón (Scallopini); Tekvica; Lufa ostrohranná; Hadia tekvica (Padwal); Špagetová; Turbanová; Žltá tekvica; Cuketa; Iné
zh-TW: 南瓜和葫蘆品種: 橡子南瓜; 冬瓜; 苦瓜; 扁蒲 (蒲瓜); 奶油杯南瓜; 奶油南瓜; 佛手瓜; 彎頸南瓜; 庫肖南瓜; 德利卡南瓜; 菊座南瓜 (Futsu squash); 觀賞葫蘆; 蜜果南瓜; 哈巴德南瓜; 紅瓜; 栗子南瓜 (Kabocha); 飛碟瓜; 南瓜; 絲瓜; 蛇瓜; 魚翅瓜; 頭巾南瓜; 黃櫛瓜; 櫛瓜; 其他
fi: Kurpitsalajike: Terhokurpitsa; Vahakurpitsa; Karvaskurkku (karela); Pullokurpitsa (dudhi); Buttercup-kurpitsa; Myskikurpitsa; Kajottikurpitsa; Crookneck-kurpitsa; Cushaw-kurpitsa; Delicata-kurpitsa; Futsu-kurpitsa; Koristekurpitsa; Honeynut-kurpitsa; Hubbard-kurpitsa; Tindora; Kabocha-kurpitsa; Kiekkokurpitsa (scallopini); Kurpitsa; Särmäkurkku; Käärmekurkku (padwal); Spagettikurpitsa; Turbaanikurpitsa; Keltainen kesäkurpitsa; Kesäkurpitsa; Muu
ko: 호박과 박 종류: 도토리 호박; 동아; 여주(카렐라); 조롱박(두디); 단호박(버터컵); 버터넛; 차요테; 크룩넥; 쿠쇼 호박; 델리카타; 풋수; 호박(장식용); 허니넛; 허바드; 아이비 고드(틴도라); 단호박; 패티팬(스캘로피니); 호박; 수세미오이; 뱀오이(파드왈); 국수호박; 터번 호박; 노란 호박; 애호박(주키니); 기타
pl: Odmiana dyni i tykwy: Dynia żołędziowa (Acorn); Tykwa woskowa (Ash gourd); Przepękla ogórkowata (Karela); Tykwa pospolita (Dudhi); Dynia Buttercup; Dynia piżmowa (Butternut); Kolczoch jadalny (Chayote); Dynia krzywoszyjka (Crookneck); Dynia Cushaw; Dynia Delicata; Dynia Futsu; Tykwa (ozdobna); Dynia Honeynut; Dynia Hubbard; Coccinia grandis (Tindora); Dynia Kabocha; Patison; Dynia zwyczajna; Trukwa (Ridge gourd); Gurdlin (Padwal); Dynia makaronowa; Dynia turbanowa; Żółta cukinia; Cukinia; Inne
da: Variant af squash og græskar: Acorn; Voksgræskar (Ash gourd); Bitteragurk (Karela); Flaskegræskar (Dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chayote; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Pyntegræskar; Honeynut; Hubbard; Skarlagenagurk (Tindora); Kabocha; Pattypan (Scallopini); Græskar; Ridge gourd; Slangeagurk (Padwal); Spaghettigræskar; Turban; Gul squash; Zucchini (Courgette); Andet
hu: Tök és tökfajta: Makk alakú tök; Viasztök; Balzsamkörte (Karela); Lopótök (Dudhi); Buttercup; Pézsmatök; Egynyári kabakos (Chayote); Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Dísztök; Honeynut; Hubbard; Tindora; Kabocha; Csillagtök (Ufótök); Sütőtök; Bordás tök; Kígyótök (Padwal); Spagettitök; Turbántök; Sárga tök; Cukkini; Egyéb
en: Squash and gourd variety: Acorn; Ash gourd; Bitter gourd (Karela); Bottle gourd (Dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chayote; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Gourd (decorative); Honeynut; Hubbard; Ivy gourd (Tindora); Kabocha; Pattypan (Scallopini); Pumpkin; Ridge gourd; Snake gourd (Padwal); Spaghetti; Turban; Yellow squash; Zucchini (Courgette); Other
pt-PT: Variedade de abóbora e cabaça: Bolota; Abóbora-cera; Melão-amargo (karela); Cabaça (dudhi); Buttercup; Butternut; Chuchu; Crookneck; Cushaw; Delicata; Futsu; Cabaça (decorativa); Honeynut; Hubbard; Abóbora-hera (tindora); Kabocha; Pattypan (scallopini); Abóbora; Lufa; Abóbora-serpente (padwal); Esparguete; Turbante; Abóbora-amarela; Curgete (zucchini); Outro
cs: Odrůda dýní a tykví: Žaludová dýně; Voskovec (ash gourd); Momordika (karela); Lagenárie (dudhi); Máslová dýně (buttercup); Máslová dýně (butternut); Čajot; Křivokrčka (crookneck); Dýně cushaw; Dýně delicata; Dýně futsu; Okrasná dýně; Dýně honeynut; Dýně hubbard; Tindora (ivy gourd); Dýně hokaido (kabocha); Patizon; Dýně; Lufa ostrohranná (ridge gourd); Vlasokvět (padwal); Špagetová dýně; Turbanová dýně; Žlutá tykev; Cuketa; Jiné
vi: Các loại bí và bầu: Quả sồi (Acorn); Bí đao; Khổ qua (Mướp đắng); Bầu; Bí ngô (Buttercup); Bí đỏ hạt đậu; Su su; Bí cổ cong (Crookneck); Cushaw; Bí Delicata; Futsu; Bầu (trang trí); Honeynut; Bí Hubbard; Bình bát dây (Tindora); Bí ngô Kabocha; Bí đĩa bay (Pattypan); Bí ngô; Mướp khía; Mướp rắn; Bí sợi mì (Spaghetti); Bí Turban; Bí ngòi vàng; Bí ngòi; Khác